Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 7
RIGHTS-OF-WAY

Cross references:

For penalties for class A and class B traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-4-701. Vehicles approaching or entering intersection.

When two vehicles approach or enter an intersection from different highways at approximately the same time, the driver of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right-of-way to the vehicle on the right.

The foregoing rule is modified at through highways and otherwise as stated in sections 42-4-702 to 42-4-704.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2346, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-601 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-701 was relocated to § 42-4-801.

42-4-702. Vehicle turning left.

The driver of a vehicle intending to turn to the left within an intersection or into an alley, private road, or driveway shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction which is within the intersection or so close thereto as to constitute an immediate hazard. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2346, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-602 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-702 was relocated to § 42-4-802.

42-4-703. Entering through highway - stop or yield intersection.

The department of transportation and local authorities, within their respective jurisdictions, may erect and maintain stop signs, yield signs, or other official traffic control devices to designate through highways or to designate intersections or other roadway junctions at which vehicular traffic on one or more of the roadways is directed to yield or to stop and yield before entering the intersection or junction. In the case of state highways, such regulations shall be subject to the provisions of section 43-2-135 (1)(g), C.R.S.

Every sign erected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be a standard sign adopted by the department of transportation.

Except when directed to proceed by a police officer, every driver of a vehicle approaching a stop sign shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it. After having stopped, the driver shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time when such driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways.

The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign, in obedience to such sign, shall slow to a speed reasonable for the existing conditions and, if required for safety to stop, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it. After slowing or stopping, the driver shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time such driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways; except that, if a driver is involved in a collision with a vehicle in the intersection or junction of roadways after driving past a yield sign without stopping, such collision shall be deemed prima facie evidence of the driver's failure to yield right-of-way.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2347, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-603 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-703 was relocated to § 42-4-803.

42-4-704. Vehicle entering roadway.

The driver of a vehicle about to enter or cross a roadway from any place other than another roadway shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles approaching on the roadway to be entered or crossed. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2347, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-604 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-704 was relocated to § 42-4-804.

Cross references:

For duty to yield when entering a roadway from a driveway or alley, see § 42-4-710.

42-4-705. Operation of vehicle approached by emergency vehicle - operation of vehicle approaching stationary emergency vehicle, stationary towing carrier vehicle, or stationary public utility service vehicle.

Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle making use of audible or visual signals meeting the requirements of section 42-4-213 or 42-4-222, the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the right-of-way and where possible shall immediately clear the farthest left-hand lane lawfully available to through traffic and shall drive to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand edge or curb of a roadway clear of any intersection and shall stop and remain in that position until the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, except when otherwise directed by a police officer.

A driver in a vehicle shall exhibit due care and caution and proceed as described in subsections (2)(b) and (2)(c) of this section when approaching or passing:

A stationary authorized emergency vehicle that is giving a visual signal by means of flashing, rotating, or oscillating red, blue, or white lights as permitted by section 42-4-213 or 42-4-222;

A stationary towing carrier vehicle that is giving a visual signal by means of flashing, rotating, or oscillating yellow lights; or

A stationary public utility service vehicle that is giving a visual signal by means of flashing, rotating, or oscillating amber lights.

On a highway with at least two adjacent lanes proceeding in the same direction on the same side of the highway where a stationary authorized emergency vehicle, stationary towing carrier vehicle, or stationary public utility service vehicle is located, the driver of an approaching or passing vehicle shall proceed with due care and caution and yield the right-of-way by moving into a lane at least one moving lane apart from the stationary authorized emergency vehicle, stationary towing carrier vehicle, or stationary public utility service vehicle unless directed otherwise by a peace officer or other authorized emergency personnel. If movement to an adjacent moving lane is not possible due to weather, road conditions, or the immediate presence of vehicular or pedestrian traffic, the driver of the approaching vehicle shall proceed in the manner described in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

On a highway that does not have at least two adjacent lanes proceeding in the same direction on the same side of the highway where a stationary authorized emergency vehicle, stationary towing carrier vehicle, or stationary public utility service vehicle is located, or if movement by the driver of the approaching vehicle into an adjacent moving lane, as described in subsection (2)(b) of this section, is not possible, the driver of an approaching vehicle shall reduce and maintain a safe speed with regard to the location of the stationary authorized emergency vehicle, stationary towing carrier vehicle, or stationary public utility service vehicle; weather conditions; road conditions; and vehicular or pedestrian traffic and proceed with due care and caution, or as directed by a peace officer or other authorized emergency personnel.

For the purposes of this subsection (2)(c), the following speeds are presumed to be safe unless the speeds are unsafe for the conditions as provided in section 42-4-1101 (1) and (3):

If the speed limit is less than forty-five miles per hour, twenty-five miles per hour or less; or

If the speed limit is forty-five miles per hour or more, twenty miles per hour less than the speed limit.

(2.5) (a) A driver in a vehicle that is approaching or passing a maintenance, repair, or construction vehicle that is moving at less than twenty miles per hour shall exhibit due care and caution and proceed as described in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (2.5).

On a highway with at least two adjacent lanes proceeding in the same direction on the same side of the highway where a stationary or slow-moving maintenance, repair, or construction vehicle is located, the driver of an approaching or passing vehicle shall proceed with due care and caution and yield the right-of-way by moving into a lane at least one moving lane apart from the vehicle, unless directed otherwise by a peace officer or other authorized emergency personnel. If movement to an adjacent moving lane is not possible due to weather, road conditions, or the immediate presence of vehicular or pedestrian traffic, the driver of the approaching vehicle shall proceed in the manner described in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2.5).

On a highway that does not have at least two adjacent lanes proceeding in the same direction on the same side of the highway where a stationary or slow-moving maintenance, repair, or construction vehicle is located, or if movement by the driver of the approaching vehicle into an adjacent moving lane, as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2.5), is not possible, the driver of an approaching vehicle shall reduce and maintain a safe speed with regard to the location of the stationary or slow-moving maintenance, repair, or construction vehicle, weather conditions, road conditions, and vehicular or pedestrian traffic, and shall proceed with due care and caution, or as directed by a peace officer or other authorized emergency personnel.

(2.6) (a) A driver in a vehicle that is approaching or passing a motor vehicle where the tires are being equipped with chains on the side of the highway shall exhibit due care and caution and proceed as described in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (2.6).

On a highway with at least two adjacent lanes proceeding in the same direction on the same side of the highway where chains are being applied to the tires of a motor vehicle, the driver of an approaching or passing vehicle shall proceed with due care and caution and yield the right-of-way by moving into a lane at least one moving lane apart from the vehicle, unless directed otherwise by a peace officer or other authorized emergency personnel. If movement to an adjacent moving lane is not possible due to weather, road conditions, or the immediate presence of vehicular or pedestrian traffic, the driver of the approaching vehicle shall proceed in the manner described in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2.6).

On a highway that does not have at least two adjacent lanes proceeding in the same direction on the same side of the highway where chains are being applied to the tires of a motor vehicle, or if movement by the driver of the approaching vehicle into an adjacent moving lane, as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2.6), is not possible, the driver of an approaching vehicle shall reduce and maintain a safe speed with regard to the location of the motor vehicle where chains are being applied to the tires, weather conditions, road conditions, and vehicular or pedestrian traffic, and shall proceed with due care and caution, or as directed by a peace officer or other authorized emergency personnel.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3)(b)(II) and (3)(b)(III) of this section, any person who violates subsection (2), (2.5), or (2.6) of this section commits careless driving as described in section 42-4-1402.

If the person violates subsection (2) of this section and the person's actions are the proximate cause of bodily injury to another person, the person commits a class 1 misdemeanor and shall be punished as described in section 18-1.3-501.

If the person violates subsection (2) of this section and the person's actions are the proximate cause of the death of another person, the person commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as described in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2347, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 711, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2.5) and (2.6) added and (3)(b) amended, p. 2081, § 6, effective June 3.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (SB 11-260), ch. 298, p. 1434, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), and (3)(b) amended, (SB 17-229), ch. 278, p. 1520, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (HB 20-1145), ch. 107, p. 420, § 1, effective September 14.

42-4-706. Obedience to railroad signal.

Any driver of a motor vehicle approaching a railroad crossing sign shall slow down to a speed that is reasonable and safe for the existing conditions. If required to stop for a traffic control device, flagperson, or safety before crossing the railroad grade crossing, the driver shall stop at the marked stop line, if any. If no such stop line exists, the driver shall:

Stop not less than fifteen feet nor more than fifty feet from the nearest rail of the railroad grade crossing and shall not proceed until the railroad grade can be crossed safely; or

In the event the driver would not have a reasonable view of approaching trains when stopped pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), stop before proceeding across the railroad grade crossing at the point nearest such crossing where the driver has a reasonable view of approaching trains and not proceed until the railroad grade can be crossed safely.

No person shall drive any vehicle through, around, or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad crossing while such gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed, nor shall any pedestrian pass through, around, over, or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad grade crossing while such gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2348, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(b) amended, p. 955, § 14, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-606 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-706 was relocated to § 42-4-806.

42-4-707. Certain vehicles must stop at railroad grade crossings.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the driver of a school bus, as defined in paragraph (b) of subsection (5) of this section, carrying any schoolchild, the driver of a vehicle carrying hazardous materials that is required to be placarded in accordance with regulations issued pursuant to section 42-20-108, or the driver of a commercial vehicle, as defined in section 42-4-235, that is transporting passengers, before crossing at grade any tracks of a railroad, shall stop such vehicle within fifty feet but not less than fifteen feet from the nearest rail of such railroad and while so stopped shall listen and look in both directions along such track for any approaching train and for signals indicating the approach of a train and shall not proceed until the driver can do so safely. After stopping as required in this section and upon proceeding when it is safe to do so, the driver of any said vehicle shall cross only in such gear of the vehicle that there will be no necessity for changing gears while traversing such crossing, and the driver shall not manually shift gears while crossing the tracks.

This section shall not apply at street railway grade crossings within a business district.

When stopping as required at such railroad crossing, the driver shall keep as far to the right of the roadway as possible and shall not form two lanes of traffic unless the roadway is marked for four or more lanes of traffic.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply at:

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2006, p. 42

, § 1, effective July 1, 2006.)

Any railroad grade crossing at which traffic is regulated by a traffic control signal;

Any railroad grade crossing at which traffic is controlled by a police officer or human flagperson;

Any railroad crossing where state or local road authorities within their respective jurisdictions have determined that trains are not operating during certain periods or seasons of the year and have erected an official sign carrying the legend "exempt", which shall give notice when so posted that such crossing is exempt from the stopping requirement provided for in this section.

For the purposes of this section:

The definition of hazardous materials shall be the definition contained in the rules adopted by the chief of the Colorado state patrol pursuant to section 42-20-108.

"School bus" means a school bus that is required to bear on the front and rear of such school bus the words "SCHOOL BUS" and display visual signal lights pursuant to section 42-4-1903 (2)(a).

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2349, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 956, § 15, effective May 25.

L. 2000:

(1) and (5) amended, p. 20, § 2, effective March 9.

L. 2006:

(1), (2), and (4)(a) amended, p. 42, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(5)(b) amended, (HB 10-1232), ch. 163, p. 573, § 13, effective April 28.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-608 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-707 was relocated to § 42-4-807.

42-4-708. Moving heavy equipment at railroad grade crossing.

No person shall operate or move any crawler-type tractor, steam shovel, derrick, or roller or any equipment or structure having a normal operating speed of ten or less miles per hour or a vertical body or load clearance of less than nine inches above the level surface of a roadway upon or across any tracks at a railroad grade crossing without first complying with this section.

Notice of any such intended crossing shall be given to a superintendent of such railroad and a reasonable time be given to such railroad to provide proper protection at such crossing.

Before making any such crossing, the person operating or moving any such vehicle or equipment shall first stop the same not less than fifteen feet nor more than fifty feet from the nearest rail of such railroad, and while so stopped shall listen and look in both directions along such track for any approaching train and for signals indicating the approach of a train, and shall not proceed until the crossing can be made safely.

No such crossing shall be made when warning is given by automatic signal or crossing gates or a flagperson or otherwise of the immediate approach of a railroad train or car.

Subsection (3) of this section shall not apply at any railroad crossing where state or local road authorities within their respective jurisdictions have determined that trains are not operating during certain periods or seasons of the year and have erected an official sign carrying the legend "exempt", which shall give notice when so posted that such crossing is exempt from the stopping requirement provided in this section.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2350, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-609 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-709. Stop when traffic obstructed.

No driver shall enter an intersection or a marked crosswalk or drive onto any railroad grade crossing unless there is sufficient space on the other side of the intersection, crosswalk, or railroad grade crossing to accommodate the vehicle the driver is operating without obstructing the passage of other vehicles, pedestrians, or railroad trains, notwithstanding the indication of any traffic control signal to proceed. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2350, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-609.5 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-709 was relocated to § 42-4-808.

42-4-710. Emerging from or entering alley, driveway, or building.

The driver of a vehicle emerging from an alley, driveway, building, parking lot, or other place, immediately prior to driving onto a sidewalk or into the sidewalk area extending across any such alleyway, driveway, or entranceway, shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian upon or about to enter such sidewalk or sidewalk area extending across such alleyway, driveway, or entranceway, as may be necessary to avoid collision, and when entering the roadway shall comply with the provisions of section 42-4-704.

The driver of a vehicle entering an alley, driveway, or entranceway shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian within or about to enter the sidewalk or sidewalk area extending across such alleyway, driveway, or entranceway.

No person shall drive any vehicle other than a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or any other human-powered vehicle upon a sidewalk or sidewalk area, except upon a permanent or duly authorized temporary driveway.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2351, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1277, § 52, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3478, § 58, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-610 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-711. Driving on mountain highways.

The driver of a motor vehicle traveling through defiles or canyons or on mountain highways shall hold such motor vehicle under control and as near to the right-hand edge of the highway as reasonably possible and, except when driving entirely to the right of the center of the roadway, shall give audible warning with the horn of such motor vehicle upon approaching any curve where the view is obstructed within a distance of two hundred feet along the highway.

On narrow mountain highways with turnouts having a grade of six percent or more, ascending vehicles shall have the right-of-way over descending vehicles, except where it is more practicable for the ascending vehicle to return to a turnout.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2351, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-611 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-712. Driving in highway work area.

The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any authorized vehicle or pedestrian engaged in work upon a highway within any highway construction or maintenance work area indicated by official traffic control devices.

The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any authorized service vehicle engaged in work upon a highway whenever such vehicle displays flashing lights meeting the requirements of section 42-4-214.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2351, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2014:

(3) amended, (SB 14-060), ch. 70, p. 298, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-614 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-713. Yielding right-of-way to transit buses - definitions - penalty.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Public mass transit operator" has the same meaning as in section 43-1-102 (5), C.R.S.

"Transit bus" means a bus operated by a public mass transit operator.

Drivers of vehicles in the same lane of traffic and behind a transit bus shall yield the right-of-way to the bus if:

The driver of the transit bus, after stopping to allow passengers to board or exit, is signaling an intention to enter a traffic lane; and

A yield sign as described in subsection (3) of this section is displayed and illuminated on the back of the transit bus.

The yield sign referred to in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section shall:

Warn a driver of a vehicle behind the transit bus that the driver is required to yield when the bus is entering a traffic lane; and

Be illuminated when the driver of the transit bus is attempting to enter a traffic lane.

This section does not require a public mass transit operator to install yield signs as described in subsection (3) of this section on transit buses operated by the public mass transit operator.

This section does not relieve a driver of a transit bus from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the roadway.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1027), ch. 79, p. 287, § 1, effective August 5.

42-4-714. Bicyclist or other authorized user in bicycle lane.

The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to a bicyclist or other authorized user of a bicycle lane in a bicycle lane.

Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

If a person violates subsection (1) of this section and the person's actions are the proximate cause of a crash, the person commits careless driving and shall be punished as described in section 42-4-1402 (2)(a).

If a person violates subsection (1) of this section and the person's actions are the proximate cause of bodily injury to another person, the person commits careless driving and shall be punished as described in section 42-4-1402 (2)(b).

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (SB 20-061), ch. 30, p. 101, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Section 5 of chapter 30 (SB 20-061), Session Laws of Colorado 2020, provides that the act adding this section applies to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2020.